Utah statutes.
53-3-103.   Driver License Division -- Creation -- Director -- Appointment -- Term -- Compensation.

(1)  There is created within the department the Driver License Division.

(2)  The division shall be administered by a director appointed by the commissioner with the approval of the governor.

(3)  The director is the executive and administrative head of the division and shall be experienced in administration and possess additional qualifications as determined by the commissioner and as provided by law.

(4)  The director acts under the supervision and control of the commissioner and may be removed from his position at the will of the commissioner.

(5)  The director shall receive compensation as provided by Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.



Enacted by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

